Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.72.130

Intimidating a juror.

(1) A person is guilty of intimidating a juror if a person directs a threat to a former juror because of the juror's vote, opinion, decision, or other official action as a juror, or if, by use of a threat, he or she attempts to influence a juror's vote, opinion, decision, or other official action as a juror.

(2) "Threat" as used in this section means:

(a) To communicate, directly or indirectly, the intent immediately to use force against any person who is present at the time; or

(b) Threats as defined in RCW 9A.04.110.

(3) Intimidating a juror is a class B felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 395; 1985 c 327 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.72.130.]